District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.15

Location of new convention center.

(a)

The new convention center should be located within an area bounded by 7th Street, N.W., N Street, N.W., 9th Street, N.W., and Mount Vernon Square, N.W.

(b)

The Mayor may evaluate and consider other alternative sites in which to locate the new convention center. The Mayor should specifically evaluate and consider 2 alternative sites: the site bounded by New York Avenue, N.E., 1st Street, N.E., M Street, N.E., and the rail line to Florida Avenue; and the site located at the Anacostia Metro.

(c)

If the Mayor determines that the new convention center should be located at a site other than the site described in subsection (a) of this section, then the Mayor may designate the alternative site as the site for the new convention center with the advice and consent of the Council by resolution.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 215, 41 DCR 5333

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-1202.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-816.